test/src/morphology/V-aigo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - aigõ: # Verb 'to measure' - full paradigm
     aigõ+V+TV+Inf: aigõ

     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: āigõb
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: āigõd
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: āigõb
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: aigõm
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aigõt
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aigõbõd

     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aig
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl1: aigõm
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl2: aigõt
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Pl3: aigõt
# Since there is no distinction between present and preterite in the forms
# perhaps there is no reason to show this as morphology 
#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg: aig
#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1: aigõm
#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2: aigõt
#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: aigõt

     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: āigiz
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: āigizt
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: āigiz
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: āigizmõ
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [āigizt, āigiztõ]
     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [āigizt, āigiztõ]

#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg: aig
#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl1: aigõm
#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl2: aigõt
#     aigõ+V+TV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: aigõt
     
     aigõ+V+TV+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: aig
     aigõ+V+TV+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: aigõgõm
     aigõ+V+TV+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: aigõgid

     aigõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Sg1: aigõks
     aigõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Sg2: aigõkst
     aigõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Sg3: aigõks
     aigõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl1: aigõksmõ
     aigõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl2: aigõkstõ
     aigõ+V+TV+Cond+Prs+Pl3: aigõkstõ

     aigõ+V+TV+Jus+Prs+Sg: aigõg
     aigõ+V+TV+Jus+Prs+Pl: aigõgõd

     aigõ+V+TV+Quo+Prs+Sg: aigiji
     aigõ+V+TV+Quo+Prs+Pl: aigijid
     
     aigõ+V+TV+Act+PrsPrc+Sg: aigõb     
     aigõ+V+TV+Act+PrsPrc+Pl: aigõbõd
     aigõ+V+TV+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: aigõn
     aigõ+V+TV+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: aigõnd

     aigõ+V+TV+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg: aigdõb
     aigõ+V+TV+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl: aigdõbõd
     aigõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aigdõd

     aigõ+V+TV+Ger+Ine: aigõs
     aigõ+V+TV+Sup+Ill: aigõm
     
     
#    aigõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aig
     kuoŗŗõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kuoŗ
     vannõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: van
     pȯļļõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯļ
     pȯimõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯim
     ouŗõ+V+IV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ouŗ
     keijõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: keij
     aŗštõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: aŗšt
     pȯrtõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯrt
     outõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: out
     tundõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tund
     oudõ+V+TV+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: oud

#aigõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aigdõd
     kuoŗŗõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: kuoŗdõd
     vannõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: vandõd
     pȯļļõ+V+IV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯļdõd
     pȯimõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯimdõd
     ouŗõ+V+IV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: ouŗdõd
     keijõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: keijdõd
     aŗštõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: aŗštõd
     pȯrtõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: pȯrtõd
     outõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: outõd
     tundõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: tundtõd
     oudõ+V+TV+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg: oudtõd
